Utah statutes.
63A-3-302.   Unpaid account receivable due the state.

If any account receivable has been unpaid for more than 90 days, any agency, department, division, commission, committee, board, council, institution, or any other authority of state government responsible for collection of the account may proceed under this part to collect the delinquent amount.



Enacted by Chapter 212, 1993 General Session

